Nebraska, session 109, LB688.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB688 LB688
2025 2025
1 Section 1. (1) For purposes of this section, electronic nicotine
2 delivery system has the same meaning as in section 28-1418.01.
3 (2) It shall be unlawful for any person to advertise any electronic
4 nicotine delivery system in the State of Nebraska.
-2-